Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 6. Volunteer Physicians and Physician Assistants

§ 33-26-601.
Emeritus physician and physician assistant licenses.

As used in this section, “low income uninsured person” has the same meaning as in W.S. 33-15-131(a).

For purposes of this section, a person shall be considered retired from practice if the person’s license has expired.

The state board of medicine may issue, with or without examination, an emeritus physician or emeritus physician assistant license to a person who is retired from practice so that the person may provide medical services. The board shall deny issuance of an emeritus physician or emeritus physician assistant license to a person who is not qualified under this section to hold an emeritus license.

An application for an emeritus license shall include all of the following:

A copy of the applicant’s medical education and postgraduate training documents certified as true and accurate by the state licensing authority with whom the physician or physician’s assistant holds current licensure or has most recently held current licensure;

A copy of the applicant’s most recent license authorizing the practice of medicine issued by a jurisdiction in the United States that licenses persons to practice medicine;

Evidence of one (1) of the following, as applicable:

That the applicant has maintained for at least ten (10) years immediately prior to retirement full licensure in good standing in any jurisdiction in the United States that licenses persons to practice allopathic or osteopathic medicine or to practice as a physician assistant; or

That the applicant has practiced for at least ten (10) years immediately prior to retirement in good standing as a doctor of allopathic or osteopathic medicine or as a physician assistant in one (1) or more of the branches of the United States armed services; and

A notarized statement from the applicant, on a form prescribed by the board, that the applicant:

Will not accept any form of remuneration for any medical services rendered while in possession of an emeritus license; and

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 201, § 2.

Will provide any other documentation that the board reasonably may require.

The holder of an emeritus license may provide medical services on the premises of a health care facility or a medical practice in this state and to low income uninsured persons. The holder shall not accept any form of remuneration for providing medical services while in possession of the license. The board may revoke an emeritus license on receiving proof satisfactory to the board that the holder has engaged in practice in this state outside the scope of the license.

An emeritus license shall be valid for a period of one (1) year, unless earlier revoked under subsection (e) of this section or pursuant to title 33, chapter 26 of the Wyoming statutes. An emeritus license may be renewed upon the application of the holder. The board shall maintain a register of all persons who hold emeritus licenses. The board shall not charge a fee for issuing or renewing a license pursuant to this section.

To be eligible for renewal of an emeritus license, the holder of the license shall certify to the board completion of any continuing education required under this chapter as if the holder of the license were in active practice. The board shall not renew a license if the holder has not complied with the continuing education requirements. A health care facility or a medical practice in which the holder of an emeritus license provides medical services may pay for or reimburse the holder for any costs incurred in obtaining the required continuing education.

The board shall issue to each person who qualifies under this section an emeritus license. The emeritus medical license shall permit the general practice of medicine under this chapter. The emeritus physician assistant license shall permit the practices authorized for physician assistants under W.S.

33-26-501

through

33-26-512

.

Except as provided in this section, any person holding an emeritus license issued by the board under this section shall be subject to the requirements of this chapter and the jurisdiction of the board.

The board shall adopt rules to administer and enforce this section.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 116, § 1; 2009, ch. 201, §§ 1, 2.

The 2009 amendment,

substituted “has the same meaning” for “and ‘nonprofit health care facility’ have the same meanings” in (a); rewrote (c)
pertaining to a volunteer's license; substituted “an emeritus license” or variants for “a volunteer's license” or variants throughout (d) through (j); repealed former (d)(iv)(B) which read: “Will devote his practice exclusively and totally to providing medical services to low income uninsured persons at a nonprofit health care facility in this state”; substituted “on the premises of a health care facility or a medical practice in this state and to” for “only on the premises of a nonprofit health care facility in this state and only to” in (e); substituted “A health care facility or a medical practice in which the holder of an emeritus license provides” for “The nonprofit health care facility in which the holder provides” at the beginning of the last sentence of (g); and added the last sentence in (h).

Laws 2009, ch. 201, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2009.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.